Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1025
Esthetician, defined.

Esthetician means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to perform all of the practices of esthetics.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 18;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-357;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 287.